Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.686

Tiny house communities.

(1) A city or town may adopt an ordinance to regulate the creation of tiny house communities.

(2) The owner of the land upon which the community is built shall make reasonable accommodation for utility hookups for the provision of water, power, and sewerage services and comply with all other duties in chapter 59.20 RCW.

(3) Tenants of tiny house communities are entitled to all rights and subject to all duties and penalties required under chapter 59.20 RCW.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Tiny house" and "tiny house with wheels" means a dwelling to be used as permanent housing with permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation built in accordance with the state building code.

(b) "Tiny house communities" means real property rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of tiny houses with wheels or tiny houses utilizing the binding site plan process in RCW 58.17.035.

[ 2019 c 352 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—2019 c 352: See note following RCW 58.17.040.